Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Mississippi Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Law
§ 53-9-55.
Violation of chapter; civil penalties; public hearing; judicial review; limitations on liability.

When the commission or an authorized representative of the department has reason to believe that a violation of this chapter or any regulation or order of the commission or permit board or any condition of a permit has occurred, the commission may cause a written complaint to be served upon the alleged violator. The complaint shall specify the section, regulation, order or permit alleged to be violated and the facts alleged to constitute the violation and shall require the alleged violator to appear before the commission at a time and place specified in the order to answer the complaint. The time of appearance before the commission shall be not less than twenty (20) days from the date of the mailing or service of the complaint, whichever is earlier.

The commission shall afford an opportunity for a formal hearing to the alleged violator at the time and place specified in the complaint or at another time or place agreed to in writing by both the department and the alleged violator, and approved by the commission. On the basis of the evidence produced at the formal hearing, the commission shall enter an order which in its opinion will best further the purposes of this chapter and shall give written notice of that order to the alleged violator and to any other persons who participated as parties at the formal hearing or who made written request for notice of the order. The commission may assess penalties as provided in this section.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, any notice or other instrument issued by or under authority of the commission may be served on any affected person personally or by publication, and proof of that service may be made in the same manner as in case of service of a summons in a civil action. The proof of service shall be filed in the office of the commission. Service may also be made by mailing a copy of the notice, order, or other instrument by certified mail, directed to the person affected at the person’s last known post-office address as shown by the files or records of the commission. Proof of service may be made by the affidavit of the person who did the mailing and shall be filed in the office of the commission.

When the commission determines that any person has violated this chapter or any regulation promulgated under this chapter, order of the commission issued under this chapter or condition or limitation of a permit issued under this chapter, the commission, after notice and opportunity for a formal hearing as provided in this section, unless expressly waived by the violator, may assess that person a civil penalty not to exceed Twenty-Five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per violation. Each day of a continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation for purposes of penalty assessments. If a cessation order is issued under Section 53-9-69, the commission shall assess a civil penalty under this section. In determining the amount of the penalty, the commission shall consider the permittee’s history of previous violations at the particular surface coal mining operation; the seriousness of the violation, including any irreparable harm to the environment and any hazard to the health or safety of the public; whether the permittee was negligent; demonstrated good faith of the permittee charged in attempting to achieve rapid compliance after notification of the violation; and other factors set forth in Section 49-17-43.

Upon the issuance of an order finding that a violation of this chapter has occurred, the person found to be in violation shall have thirty (30) days to pay the proposed penalty in full or, if the person wishes to appeal either the amount of the penalty or the fact of the violation or both forward the proposed amount as a penalty payment bond to the executive director for placement in an escrow account. The executive director shall forward any money submitted for placement in an escrow account in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commission. If, through administrative or judicial review of the violation or proposed penalty, the commission or a court of appropriate jurisdiction determines that no violation occurred or that the amount of the penalty should be reduced, the executive director shall within thirty (30) days remit the appropriate amount to the person with any interest earned on the money while in escrow. Failure to forward the proposed penalty amount to the executive director within thirty (30) days shall result in a waiver of all legal rights to contest the violation or the amount of the penalty. When all opportunities for administrative and judicial review have been exhausted, a failure to pay the civil penalty shall result in forfeiture of the bond or deposit in an amount not to exceed the amount of the penalty imposed. The commission may promulgate regulations regarding a waiver from the requirement to post a penalty payment bond upon a showing by the operator of an inability to post the bond.

When a permittee violates this chapter or any regulation or written order of the commission promulgated or issued under this chapter or any condition of a permit issued any director, officer, general partner, joint venturer in or authorized agent of the permittee who willfully and knowingly authorized, ordered or carried out that violation shall be subject to separate civil penalties in the same amount as penalties that may be imposed upon a person under subsection (2) of this section.

Civil penalties assessed by the commission and owed under this section may be recovered in a civil action brought by the department in the chancery or circuit court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or in the chancery or circuit court of any county in which the surface coal mining and reclamation operation exists or in which the defendant may be found.

Any provisions of this section and chapter regarding liability for the costs of clean-up, removal, remediation or abatement of any pollution, hazardous waste or solid waste shall be limited as provided in Section 49-17-42 and rules promulgated under that section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 23; Laws, 1995, ch. 627, § 12; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-57.
Criminal penalties; violation of condition of permit or order.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates this chapter or any regulation or written order of the commission promulgated or issued under this chapter or any condition of a permit, or makes any false statement, representation or certification or knowingly fails to make any statement, representation or certification in any application, record, report, plan or other document filed or required to be maintained under a regulation or written order of the commission promulgated or issued under this chapter, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 24; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-59.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 46, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

[Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1979.].

§ 53-9-61.
Criminal penalties; resisting, preventing, impeding, or interfering with performance of duties.

Any person who, except as permitted by law, willfully resists, impedes or interferes with the commission, permit board or any authorized representative of the department in the performance of duties under this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 36; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 29, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-63.
Nonexclusivity of penalty provisions.

Nothing in Sections 53-9-55 through 53-9-57 shall be construed to eliminate any additional enforcement right or procedures which are available under state law to a state agency but which are not specifically enumerated in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 26; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-65.
Release of bond; objections; hearing; bond forfeiture.

The permittee may file an application with the permit board for the release of all or part of a performance bond or other collateral. The permittee and the permit board shall give notice of the pending bond release application by publication in the form as the commission by regulation may require. The permit board, after adequate inspection and evaluation of the reclamation work involved, shall decide whether or not to release all or part of the bond or other collateral and shall notify the permittee in writing of its decision. If the permit board’s decision is not to release all or part of the bond or other collateral, the permit board shall state in writing the reasons for its decision and recommend corrective actions necessary to secure the release.

The permit board may release in whole or in part the bond or other collateral if the permit board is satisfied the reclamation covered by the bond or other collateral or portion thereof has been accomplished as required by this chapter according to the following schedule:

When the operator completes the backfilling, regrading and drainage control of a bonded area in accordance with the approved mining and reclamation plan, up to sixty percent (60%) of the bond or other collateral for the applicable permit area may be released, but the amount of the unreleased portion of the bond or other collateral shall not be less than the amount necessary to assure completion of the reclamation work by a third party in the event of default by the operator.

After revegetation has been established on the regraded mined lands in accordance with the approved mining and reclamation plan, the permit board, when determining the amount of bond or other collateral to be released after successful revegetation has been established, shall retain that amount of bond or other collateral for the revegetated area which would be sufficient for a third party to cover the cost of reestablishing revegetation and for the period specified for operator responsibility in the regulations promulgated under Section 53-9-45 for reestablishing revegetation. No part of the bond or other collateral shall be released under this paragraph if the lands to which the release would be applicable are contributing suspended solids to streamflow or runoff outside the permit area in excess of the requirements set by the regulations promulgated under Section 53-9-45, or until soil productivity for prime farmlands has returned to equivalent levels of yield as nonmined land of the same soil type in the surrounding area under equivalent management practices as determined from the soil survey performed in accordance with the regulations promulgated under Section 53-9-25. If a silt dam is to be retained as a permanent impoundment under the regulations promulgated under Section 53-9-45, the portion of bond or other collateral may be released under this paragraph if provisions for sound future maintenance by the operator or the landowner have been made with and approved by the permit board.

When the operator has completed successfully all surface coal mining and reclamation activities, the remaining portion of the bond or other collateral may be released, but shall not be released before the expiration of the period specified for operator responsibility in the regulations promulgated under Section 53-9-45. No bond shall be fully released until all reclamation requirements of this chapter are fully met.

Any interested party or the responsible officer or head of any federal, state or local governmental agency which has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect to any environmental, social or economic impact involved in the operation, or is authorized to develop and enforce environmental standards with respect to the operations, may submit written comments on the proposed release from bond or other collateral, and request a public hearing concerning the bond release application under Section 49-17-29. The failure of any person to submit comments within the time required shall not preclude action by the permit board. Any request for a public hearing concerning the bond release application shall be made in writing within thirty (30) days after the last publication of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section. The permit board may on its own motion hold a public hearing concerning the bond release application. If requested, the permit board shall hold a public hearing to obtain comments from the public on the application for bond release. The date, time and location of the public hearings shall be advertised by the permit board in the same manner as provided for the publication of notice for advertisement of land ownership under Section 53-9-37. The last public hearing notice shall be published at least seven (7), but no more than fourteen (14) days before the scheduled public hearing date. If all persons requesting the public hearing stipulate agreement before the requested public hearing, the public hearing may be cancelled at the discretion of the permit board.

Within thirty (30) days after the permit board takes action on the bond release application as recorded in the minutes of the permit board, any person who filed a written comment or requested or participated in the public hearing under this subsection may request a formal hearing before the permit board regarding its initial decision to grant or deny the bond release. The formal hearing shall be conducted as provided by Section 49-17-29. Upon conclusion of the formal hearing, the permit board shall enter into its minutes its final decision affirming, modifying or reversing its prior action on the bond release application. Any appeal from that decision may be taken by any person who participated as a party in the formal hearing in the manner provided in Section 49-17-29.

If a surface coal mining and reclamation operation is not proceeding in accordance with this chapter or the permit, the operation represents an imminent threat to the public health, welfare and the environment, and the operator has failed, within thirty (30) days after written notice to the operator and opportunity for a formal hearing, to take appropriate corrective action, a forfeiture proceeding may be commenced against the operator for any performance bond or other collateral posted by the operator.

A forfeiture proceeding against any performance bond or other collateral shall be commenced and conducted according to Sections 49-17-31 through 49-17-41.

If the commission orders forfeiture of any performance bond or other collateral, the entire sum of the performance bond or other collateral shall be forfeited to the department. The funds from the forfeited performance bond or other collateral shall be used to pay for reclamation of the permit area and remediation of any offsite damages resulting from the operation. Any surplus performance bond or other collateral funds shall be refunded to the operator or corporate surety.

Forfeiture proceedings shall be before the commission and an order of the commission under this subsection shall be a final order. If the commission determines that forfeiture of the performance bond or other collateral should be ordered, the department shall have the immediate right to all funds of any performance bond or other collateral, subject only to review and appeals allowed under Section 49-17-41.

If the operator cannot be located for purposes of notice, the department shall send notice of the forfeiture proceeding, certified mail, return receipt requested, to the operator’s last known address. The department shall also publish notice of the forfeiture proceeding in the same manner as provided for the publication of notice for the advertisement of land ownership under Section 53-9-37. Any formal hearing on the bond forfeiture shall be set at least thirty (30) days after the last notice publication.

If the performance bond or other collateral is insufficient to cover the costs of reclamation of the permit area or remediation of any offsite damages, the commission may initiate a civil action to recover the deficiency amount in the county in which the surface coal mining operation is located.

If the commission initiates a civil action under this section, the commission shall be entitled to any sums necessary to complete reclamation of the permit area and remediate any offsite damages resulting from that operation and attorney’s fees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 27; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-67.
Civil action; costs; nonexclusivity of provisions; limitations on liability.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any interested party may commence a civil action to compel compliance with this chapter:

Against the state or a state instrumentality or agency which is alleged to be in violation of this chapter or any rule, regulation, order or permit issued under this chapter, or against any other person who is alleged to be in violation of this chapter or any rule, regulation, order or permit issued under this chapter; or

Against the department, commission or permit board if there is alleged a failure of any one or more of them to perform any nondiscretionary act or duty under this chapter.

No action may be commenced:

Under subsection (1)(a) of this section, (i) before sixty (60) days after the plaintiff has given notice in writing of the violation to the executive director, chief legal counsel of the department, the Attorney General of the state and to any alleged violator, or (ii) if the commission has commenced and is diligently prosecuting a civil action in a court of the state or the United States to require compliance with this chapter, or any rule, regulation, order or permit issued under this chapter, but in any action any interested party may intervene as a matter of right;

Under subsection (1)(b) of this section before sixty (60) days after the plaintiff has given notice in writing of the action to the executive director, chief legal counsel of the department and commission, in the manner as the commission shall by regulation prescribe. That action may be brought immediately after the notification if the violation or order complained of constitutes an imminent threat to the health or safety of the plaintiff or would immediately affect a legal interest of the plaintiff.

Any action under this section alleging a violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter may be brought only in the chancery court of the judicial district in which the surface coal mining operation complained of is located, except any action brought under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be brought in the chancery court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County.

In any action under this section the permit board or commission, if not a party, may intervene as a matter of right.

The court, in issuing a final order in any action brought under subsection (1) of this section, may award costs of litigation, including attorney and expert witness fees, to any party, whenever the court determines that award is appropriate, but the permittee shall not be entitled to an award of attorney’s fees unless the court determines that the action of the person opposing the permittee was frivolous, unreasonable or without foundation. No award of attorney’s fees or expert witness fees shall be made against a person having an interest in real property that is or may be adversely affected by the surface coal mining operations. The court may, if a preliminary injunction is sought, require the filing of a bond or equivalent security in accordance with state law.

Nothing in this section shall restrict any right which any person or class of persons may have under any statute or the common law, to seek enforcement of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter, or to seek any other relief, including relief against the department, commission or the permit board.

Any provisions of this section and chapter regarding liability for the costs of clean-up, removal, remediation or abatement of any pollution, hazardous waste or solid waste shall be limited as provided in Section 49-17-42 and rules under that section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 28; Laws, 1995, ch. 627, § 13; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-69.
Inspection; cessation order; suspension or revocation of permit; hearing; request to attorney general to institute civil action; nonexclusivity of provisions; assessing costs and expenses.

When, on the basis of any information available, including receipt of information from any person, the executive director or state geologist as the executive director’s designee has reason to believe that any person is in violation of this chapter, any regulation or written order of the commission issued or promulgated under this chapter or any condition of a permit, the executive director or state geologist as the executive director’s designee shall immediately order inspection of the surface coal mining operation at which the alleged violation is occurring unless the information available is a result of a previous inspection of the surface coal mining operation. When the inspection results from information provided to the executive director or state geologist by any person who is not an employee of the department, the executive director or state geologist as the executive director’s designee shall notify the person when the inspection is proposed to be carried out and the person shall be allowed to accompany the inspector during the inspection.

When, on the basis of any inspection, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative determines that any condition or practices exist or that any permittee is in violation of this chapter or any regulation or written order of the commission promulgated or issued under this chapter or any condition of a permit and the condition, practice or violation also creates an imminent danger to the health and safety of the public, or is causing or can reasonably be expected to cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air or water resources, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative shall immediately order a cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations or the portion of those operations relevant to the condition, practice or violation. The cessation order shall remain in effect until the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative determines that the condition, practice or violation has been abated or until the order is modified, vacated or terminated by the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative. If the commission, executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative finds that the ordered cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations, or any portion of those operations shall not completely abate the imminent danger to health or safety of the public or the significant imminent environmental harm to land, air or water resources, the commission, executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative shall, in addition to the cessation order, impose obligations on the operator requiring the operator to take whatever steps the commission, executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative deems necessary to abate the imminent danger or the significant environmental harm.

(i) When, on the basis of an inspection, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative determines that any permittee is in violation of this chapter, any regulation or written order of the commission promulgated or issued under this chapter or any condition of a permit but that violation does not create an imminent danger to the health and safety of the public or cannot be reasonably expected to cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air or water resources, the commission, executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative shall issue an order to the permittee or agent of the permittee setting a reasonable time of not more than ninety (90) days for the abatement of the violation and if deemed necessary by the commission, executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative ordering an immediate cessation of activities violating or resulting in the violation of this chapter, the regulations promulgated under this chapter or any condition or limitation of a permit.

If, upon expiration of the period of time as originally fixed or subsequently extended, for good cause shown and upon the written finding of the commission, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative finds that the violation has not been abated, the commission, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative shall immediately order a cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations or the portion of those operations relevant to the violation. The cessation order shall remain in effect until the commission, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative determines that the violation has been abated or until that order is modified, vacated or terminated by the commission, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative. In the cessation order issued by the commission, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative, the commission, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative shall determine the steps necessary to abate the violation in the most expeditious manner possible, and shall include measures in the order necessary to achieve that abatement.

When, on the basis of an inspection, the executive director has reason to believe that a pattern of violations of this chapter, any regulation promulgated under this chapter or any condition of a permit exists or has existed, and if the executive director also finds that the violations are caused by the unwarranted failure of the permittee to comply with this chapter, any regulation promulgated under this chapter or any condition of a permit, or that the violations are willfully caused by the permittee, the executive director shall issue an order to the permittee to show cause as to why the permit should not be suspended or revoked by the permit board. Upon the permittee’s failure to show cause to the satisfaction of the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative as to why the permit should not be suspended or revoked, the executive director or the executive director’s authorized representative shall present this information to the permit board and request that the permit board suspend or revoke the permit. The permit board shall decide the executive director’s request under the procedures of Section 49-17-29(4) and (5). Any request by an interested party for a formal hearing regarding the permit board’s initial decision on suspension or revocation of the permit or any appeal of the final decision following the formal hearing by any person who participated as a party in the formal hearing may be taken as provided under Section 49-17-29(4) and (5).

The permittee or other interested party may request a formal hearing concerning an order of the commission issued under paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection as provided under Section 49-17-41.

The commission may institute a civil action for relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction or any other appropriate order, in the chancery court of the county or judicial district in which the surface coal mining and reclamation operation is located, in which the permittee has its principal office, or in the First Judicial District of Hinds County when the permittee or its agent:

Violates or fails or refuses to comply with any permit, order or decision issued by the permit board or commission under this chapter;

Interferes with, hinders or delays the commission, permit board, department, executive director or any authorized representative of the executive director in carrying out this chapter;

Refuses to admit any authorized representative of the executive director, commission, permit board or department to the mine;

Refuses to permit inspection of the mine by that authorized representative;

Refuses to furnish any information or report requested by the commission, permit board or department in furtherance of this chapter; or

Refuses to permit access to and copying of any records as the commission, permit board or department determines necessary in carrying out this chapter.

The court shall have jurisdiction to provide any relief as may be appropriate. Preliminary injunctions shall be issued in accordance with state law. The commission may obtain mandatory or prohibitory injunctive relief, either temporary or permanent, and in cases of imminent and substantial hazard or endangerment to the environment or public health, it is not necessary that the commission plead or prove: (i) that irreparable damage would result if the injunction did not issue; (ii) that there is no adequate remedy at law; or (iii) that a written complaint or commission order has first been issued for the alleged violation. Any relief granted by the court to enforce an order under subsection 2(a)(i) of this section shall continue in effect until the completion or final termination of all proceedings for review of that order under this chapter unless, before that time, the court granting the relief sets it aside or modifies it.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to eliminate any additional enforcement rights or procedures which are available under state law to a state agency but which are not specifically stated in this section.

When an order is issued under this section, or as a result of any administrative proceeding under this chapter, at the request of any person, a sum equal to the aggregate amount of all costs and expenses, including attorney’s fees, as determined by the commission to have been reasonably incurred by that person for or in conjunction with that person’s participation in the proceedings, including any judicial review of agency actions, may be assessed against either party as the court, resulting from judicial review, or the commission, resulting from administrative proceedings deems proper.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 29; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 33; Laws, 1998, ch. 373, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).

§ 53-9-71.
Designation of lands as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations.

The commission shall establish a planning process enabling objective decisions based upon competent and scientifically sound data and information as to which, if any, land areas of the state are unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations under the standards set forth in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection. Surface coal mining and reclamation permits may be issued before completion of the planning process. That designation shall not prevent the mineral exploration under this chapter of any area designated as unsuitable.

Upon petition under subsection (2) of this section, the commission shall designate an area as unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations if the commission determines that reclamation under this chapter is not technologically and economically feasible.

Upon petition under subsection (2) of this section, a surface area may be designated unsuitable for certain types of surface coal mining operations if the operations will:

Be incompatible with existing state or local land-use plans or programs;

Affect fragile or historic lands in which those operations could result in significant damage to important historic, cultural, scientific and aesthetic values and natural systems;

Affect renewable resource lands in which the operations could result in a substantial loss or reduction of long-range productivity of water supply from surface or subsurface sources or of food or fiber products. These lands shall include, but not be limited to, aquifers and aquifer recharge areas; or

Affect natural hazard lands in which the operations could substantially endanger life and property, including, but not limited to, areas subject to frequent flooding and areas of unstable geology.

The state geologist shall be responsible for surface coal mining lands review and shall assist the commission and, as practicable, regional and local governmental units in developing:

A data base and inventory system which will permit proper evaluation of the capacity of different land areas of the state to support and allow reclamation of surface coal mining operations;

A method or methods for implementing land-use planning decisions concerning surface coal mining operations; and

Proper notices and opportunities for public participation, including, but not limited to, a public hearing before making any designation or redesignation, under this section.

Determinations of the unsuitability of land for surface coal mining, under this section shall be integrated as closely as possible with present and future land-use planning and regulation processes at the federal, state and local governmental levels.

This section shall not apply to lands on which surface coal mining operations are being conducted under a permit issued under this chapter.

Any interested party may petition the commission to have an area designated as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations, or to have a designation terminated. A petition shall contain allegations of facts with supporting evidence which would tend to establish the allegations. Within six (6) months after receipt of the petition, the commission shall hold a public hearing in the county in which the affected area is located. The commission shall provide appropriate notices and publications of the date, time and location of that hearing. After an interested party has filed a petition, but before the hearing required by this subsection is held, any person may intervene by filing allegations of facts with supporting evidence which would tend to establish the allegations. Within sixty (60) days after the public hearing, the commission shall issue and furnish to the petitioner and any other party participating in the hearing a written decision regarding the petition, and the reasons for its decision. If all the petitioners stipulate agreement before the requested hearing and withdraw their request, the commission may cancel the public hearing. Any interested party aggrieved by a decision of the commission under this section may request a formal hearing as provided in Section 49-17-41. Any person who participated as a party in the formal hearing may appeal the final decision of the commission as provided in Section 49-17-41.

The commission shall promulgate regulations not less stringent than federal regulations regarding procedures for designating lands unsuitable for surface coal mining, including procedures for the content and submission of petitions and notice and public hearing requirements.

Before designating any land areas as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations, the state geologist shall prepare a detailed statement on:

The potential coal resources of the areas;

The demand for coal resources; and

The impact of the designation on the environment, the economy of the state and the supply of coal.

After July 1, 1979, and subject to valid rights, no surface coal mining operations shall be permitted:

On any lands within the boundaries of units of the National Park System, the National Wildlife Refuge Systems, the National System of Trails, the National Wilderness Preservation System, the Wild and Scenic Rivers System, including study rivers designated under Section 1276(a) of Title 16 of the United States Code, and National Recreation Areas designated by Act of Congress;

On any lands within the boundaries of any state park, state wildlife refuge, state forest, recorded state historical landmark, state historic site, state archaeological landmark, or city or county park, forest or historical area. The commission may, for good cause shown and after a public hearing, make exceptions to this paragraph;

On any federal lands within the boundaries of any national forest, unless the United States Secretary of Agriculture or the secretary’s designee finds that there are no significant recreational, timber, economic or other values which may be incompatible with the surface coal mining operations or the surface operations and impacts incident to an underground coal mine;

Which will adversely affect any publicly owned park or places included in the national register of historic sites unless approved jointly by the commission and any federal, state or local agency with jurisdiction over the park or the historic site;

Within one hundred (100) feet of the outside right-of-way line of any public road except where mine access roads or haulage roads join the right-of-way line, unless the commission authorizes those roads to be relocated or the area affected to lie within one hundred (100) feet of the road and if, after public notice and opportunity for public hearing in the county in which the surface coal mining and reclamation operations are located, the commission makes a written finding that the interests of the public and the landowners affected thereby will be protected; or

Within three hundred (300) feet of any occupied dwelling, unless waived by the owner of that dwelling, or any public building, school, church, community or institutional building, public park, or within one hundred (100) feet of a cemetery.

Those lands designated prior to July 1, 1979, as unsuitable for surface mining under the Mississippi Surface Mining and Reclamation Law, and all applicable rules and regulations promulgated under that law are unsuitable for surface coal mining under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 30; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 34; Laws, 2002, ch. 341, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-9-73.
Cooperation with Secretary of Interior.

The commission may enter into a cooperative agreement with the United States Secretary of the Interior to provide for state regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations on federal lands within the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 31; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 35, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).

§ 53-9-75.
Application of chapter to public corporations.

Any agency, unit or instrumentality of federal, state or local government, including any public-owned utility or publicly-owned corporation of federal, state or local government, which proposes to engage in surface coal mining operations subject to this chapter, shall comply with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 32; Laws, 1997, ch. 306, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1997).